Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-14] Restraint of persons charged
with offenses. Any person subject to this chapter charged with an offense
under this chapter shall be ordered into arrest or confinement, as
circumstances may require; but when charged only with an offense normally tried
by a summary court-martial, such person shall not ordinarily be placed in
confinement. When any person subject to this chapter is placed in arrest or
confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform the person
of the specific wrong of which the person is accused and to try the person or
to dismiss the charges and release the person. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next